apertium-mar.mar.dix
		<pardef n="प/हा__vblex">
			<!-- infinitives -->
			<e> 		<p><l>हाण</l><r>हाणे<s n="vblex"/><j/></r></p><par n="__inf_endings"/></e>

			<e> 		<p><l>हा</l><r>हाणे<s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/><j/></r></p><par n="__emph"/></e>

			<e> 		<p><l>ाहुया</l><r>हाणे<s n="vblex"/><s n="hort"/><j/></r></p><par n="__emph"/></e>
			<e r="LR">  <p><l>ाहुयात</l><r>हाणे<s n="vblex"/><s n="hort"/><j/></r></p><par n="__emph"/></e>
			<e>         <p><l>हायला</l><r>हाणे<s n="vblex"/><s n="incp"/><j/></r></p><par n="__emph"/></e>

			<e> 		<p><l>ाहत</l><r>हाणे<s n="vblex"/><s n="impf"/><j/></r></p><par n="__emph"/></e>

			<e> 		<p><l>ाहतो</l><r>हाणे<s n="vblex"/><s n="impf"/><s n="p1"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><j/></r></p><par n="__emph"/></e>
			<e> 		<p><l>ाहते</l><r>हाणे<s n="vblex"/><s n="impf"/><s n="p1"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><j/></r></p><par n="__emph"/></e>
			<e> 		<p><l>ाहतो</l><r>हाणे<s n="vblex"/><s n="impf"/><s n="p1"/><s n="mf"/><s n="pl"/><j/></r></p><par n="__emph"/></e>

			<e> 		<p><l>ाहतोस</l><r>हाणे<s n="vblex"/><s n="impf"/><s n="p2"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><j/></r></p><par n="__emph"/></e>
			<e> 		<p><l>ाहतेस</l><r>हाणे<s n="vblex"/><s n="impf"/><s n="p2"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><j/></r></p><par n="__emph"/></e>
			<e> 		<p><l>ाहता</l><r>हाणे<s n="vblex"/><s n="impf"/><s n="p2"/><s n="mf"/><s n="pl"/><j/></r></p><par n="__emph"/></e>

			<e> 		<p><l>ाहतो</l><r>हाणे<s n="vblex"/><s n="impf"/><s n="p3"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><j/></r></p><par n="__emph"/></e>
			<e> 		<p><l>ाहते</l><r>हाणे<s n="vblex"/><s n="impf"/><s n="p3"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><j/></r></p><par n="__emph"/></e>
			<e> 		<p><l>ाहते</l><r>हाणे<s n="vblex"/><s n="impf"/><s n="p3"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><j/></r></p><par n="__emph"/></e>
			<e> 		<p><l>ाहतात</l><r>हाणे<s n="vblex"/><s n="impf"/><s n="p3"/><s n="mfn"/><s n="pl"/><j/></r></p><par n="__emph"/></e>
			
			<e> 		<p><l>ाहिलो</l><r>हाणे<s n="vblex"/><s n="perf"/><s n="p1"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><j/></r></p><par n="__emph"/></e>
			<e> 		<p><l>ाहिले</l><r>हाणे<s n="vblex"/><s n="perf"/><s n="p1"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><j/></r></p><par n="__emph"/></e>
			<e> 		<p><l>ाहिलो</l><r>हाणे<s n="vblex"/><s n="perf"/><s n="p1"/><s n="mf"/><s n="pl"/><j/></r></p><par n="__emph"/></e>

			<e> 		<p><l>ाहिला</l><r>हाणे<s n="vblex"/><s n="perf"/><s n="p2"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><j/></r></p><par n="__emph"/></e>
			<e> 		<p><l>ाहिलास</l><r>हाणे<s n="vblex"/><s n="perf"/><s n="p2"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><j/></r></p><par n="__emph"/></e>
			<e> 		<p><l>ाहिली</l><r>हाणे<s n="vblex"/><s n="perf"/><s n="p2"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><j/></r></p><par n="__emph"/></e>
			<e> 		<p><l>ाहिलीस</l><r>हाणे<s n="vblex"/><s n="perf"/><s n="p2"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><j/></r></p><par n="__emph"/></e>
			<e> 		<p><l>ाहिला</l><r>हाणे<s n="vblex"/><s n="perf"/><s n="p2"/><s n="mf"/><s n="pl"/><j/></r></p><par n="__emph"/></e>
			<e> 		<p><l>ाहिलात</l><r>हाणे<s n="vblex"/><s n="perf"/><s n="p2"/><s n="mf"/><s n="pl"/><j/></r></p><par n="__emph"/></e>	
			<e> 		<p><l>ाहिल्या</l><r>हाणे<s n="vblex"/><s n="perf"/><s n="p2"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><j/></r></p><par n="__emph"/></e>
			<e> 		<p><l>ाहिल्यात</l><r>हाणे<s n="vblex"/><s n="perf"/><s n="p2"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><j/></r></p><par n="__emph"/></e>
			<e> 		<p><l>ाहिले</l><r>हाणे<s n="vblex"/><s n="perf"/><s n="p2"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><j/></r></p><par n="__emph"/></e>

			<e> 		<p><l>ाहिला</l><r>हाणे<s n="vblex"/><s n="perf"/><s n="p3"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><j/></r></p><par n="__emph"/></e>
			<e> 		<p><l>ाहिली</l><r>हाणे<s n="vblex"/><s n="perf"/><s n="p3"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><j/></r></p><par n="__emph"/></e>
			<e> 		<p><l>ाहिले</l><r>हाणे<s n="vblex"/><s n="perf"/><s n="p3"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><j/></r></p><par n="__emph"/></e>
			<e> 		<p><l>ाहिलं</l><r>हाणे<s n="vblex"/><s n="perf"/><s n="p3"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><j/></r></p><par n="__emph"/></e>
			<e> 		<p><l>ाहिले</l><r>हाणे<s n="vblex"/><s n="perf"/><s n="p3"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><j/></r></p><par n="__emph"/></e>
			<e> 		<p><l>ाहिलेत</l><r>हाणे<s n="vblex"/><s n="perf"/><s n="p3"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><j/></r></p><par n="__emph"/></e>
			<e> 		<p><l>ाहिल्या</l><r>हाणे<s n="vblex"/><s n="perf"/><s n="p3"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><j/></r></p><par n="__emph"/></e>
			<e> 		<p><l>ाहिल्यात</l><r>हाणे<s n="vblex"/><s n="perf"/><s n="p3"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><j/></r></p><par n="__emph"/></e>
			<e> 		<p><l>ाहिली</l><r>हाणे<s n="vblex"/><s n="perf"/><s n="p3"/><s n="nt"/><s n="pl"/><j/></r></p><par n="__emph"/></e>
			<e> 		<p><l>ाहिलीत</l><r>हाणे<s n="vblex"/><s n="perf"/><s n="p3"/><s n="nt"/><s n="pl"/><j/></r></p><par n="__emph"/></e>

			<e> 		<p><l>ाहीन</l><r>हाणे<s n="vblex"/><s n="fut"/><s n="p1"/><s n="mfn"/><s n="sg"/><j/></r></p><par n="__emph"/></e>
			<e> 		<p><l>ाहू</l><r>हाणे<s n="vblex"/><s n="fut"/><s n="p1"/><s n="mfn"/><s n="pl"/><j/></r></p><par n="__emph"/></e>
			<e> 		<p><l>हाशील</l><r>हाणे<s n="vblex"/><s n="fut"/><s n="p2"/><s n="mfn"/><s n="sg"/><j/></r></p><par n="__emph"/></e>
			<e> 		<p><l>ाहाल</l><r>हाणे<s n="vblex"/><s n="fut"/><s n="p2"/><s n="mfn"/><s n="pl"/><j/></r></p><par n="__emph"/></e>
			<e> 		<p><l>ाहेल</l><r>हाणे<s n="vblex"/><s n="fut"/><s n="p3"/><s n="mfn"/><s n="sg"/><j/></r></p><par n="__emph"/></e>
			<e> 		<p><l>ाहतील</l><r>हाणे<s n="vblex"/><s n="fut"/><s n="p3"/><s n="mfn"/><s n="pl"/><j/></r></p><par n="__emph"/></e>

			<e>       	<p><l>हाणार</l><r>हाणे<s n="vblex"/><s n="pros"/><s n="mfn"/><s n="sp"/><j/></r></p><par n="__emph"/></e>


			<!-- habitual -->
			<e>			<p><l>हायचो</l><r>हाणे<s n="vblex"/><s n="past"/><s n="hab"/><s n="p1"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><j/></r></p><par n="__emph"/></e>
			<e r='LR'>	<p><l>हायचा</l><r>हाणे<s n="vblex"/><s n="past"/><s n="hab"/><s n="p1"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><j/></r></p><par n="__emph"/></e>
			<e>			<p><l>हायची</l><r>हाणे<s n="vblex"/><s n="past"/><s n="hab"/><s n="p1"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><j/></r></p><par n="__emph"/></e>
			<e>			<p><l>हायचो</l><r>हाणे<s n="vblex"/><s n="past"/><s n="hab"/><s n="p1"/><s n="mf"/><s n="pl"/><j/></r></p><par n="__emph"/></e>
			<e>			<p><l>हायचे</l><r>हाणे<s n="vblex"/><s n="past"/><s n="hab"/><s n="p1"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><j/></r></p><par n="__emph"/></e>
			<e>			<p><l>हायच्या</l><r>हाणे<s n="vblex"/><s n="past"/><s n="hab"/><s n="p1"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><j/></r></p><par n="__emph"/></e>

			<e>			<p><l>हायचा</l><r>हाणे<s n="vblex"/><s n="past"/><s n="hab"/><s n="p2"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><j/></r></p><par n="__emph"/></e>
			<e r="LR">	<p><l>हायचास</l><r>हाणे<s n="vblex"/><s n="past"/><s n="hab"/><s n="p2"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><j/></r></p><par n="__emph"/></e>
			<e>			<p><l>हायची</l><r>हाणे<s n="vblex"/><s n="past"/><s n="hab"/><s n="p2"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><j/></r></p><par n="__emph"/></e>
			<e r="LR">	<p><l>हायचीस</l><r>हाणे<s n="vblex"/><s n="past"/><s n="hab"/><s n="p2"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><j/></r></p><par n="__emph"/></e>
			<e>			<p><l>हायचा</l><r>हाणे<s n="vblex"/><s n="past"/><s n="hab"/><s n="p2"/><s n="mf"/><s n="pl"/><j/></r></p><par n="__emph"/></e>
			<e r="LR">	<p><l>हायचात</l><r>हाणे<s n="vblex"/><s n="past"/><s n="hab"/><s n="p2"/><s n="mf"/><s n="pl"/><j/></r></p><par n="__emph"/></e>
			<e>			<p><l>हायचे</l><r>हाणे<s n="vblex"/><s n="past"/><s n="hab"/><s n="p2"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><j/></r></p><par n="__emph"/></e>
			<e r="LR">	<p><l>हायचेत</l><r>हाणे<s n="vblex"/><s n="past"/><s n="hab"/><s n="p2"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><j/></r></p><par n="__emph"/></e>
			<e>			<p><l>हायच्या</l><r>हाणे<s n="vblex"/><s n="past"/><s n="hab"/><s n="p2"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><j/></r></p><par n="__emph"/></e>
			<e r="LR">	<p><l>हायच्यात</l><r>हाणे<s n="vblex"/><s n="past"/><s n="hab"/><s n="p2"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><j/></r></p><par n="__emph"/></e>

			<e>			<p><l>हायचा</l><r>हाणे<s n="vblex"/><s n="past"/><s n="hab"/><s n="p2"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><j/></r></p><par n="__emph"/></e>
			<e>			<p><l>हायची</l><r>हाणे<s n="vblex"/><s n="past"/><s n="hab"/><s n="p2"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><j/></r></p><par n="__emph"/></e>

		<e lm="पहा">                    	<i>प</i><par n="प/हा__vblex" /></e>
		<e lm="रहा">                    	<i>र</i><par n="प/हा__vblex" /></e>
		<e lm="वहा">                    	<i>व</i><par n="प/हा__vblex" /></e>
